Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20a. new text end new text begin Lobbying contact. new text end new text begin (a) "Lobbying contact" means any oral or written communication, including an electronic communication, to a public official or a local official that is made on behalf of a principal with regard to: new text end new text begin (1) the formulation, modification, or adoption of state legislation, including legislative proposals; new text end new text begin (2) the formulation, modification, or adoption of an administrative rule, regulation, executive order, or any other program, policy, or position of the state; new text end new text begin (3) the administration or execution of a state program or policy, including the negotiation, award, or administration of a state contract, grant, loan, permit, or license; new text end new text begin (4) the nomination or confirmation of a person for a position subject to confirmation by the senate; or new text end new text begin (5) an official action of a political subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) The term "lobbying contact" does not include a communication that is: new text end new text begin (1) made by a public official or local official acting in the public official's or local official's official capacity; new text end new text begin (2) made by a state government or local government employee acting in that employee's official capacity; new text end new text begin (3) made by a representative of a media organization, including a newspaper, magazine, other publication, radio, television, cable television, or other medium of mass communication, if the purpose of the communication is gathering and disseminating news and information to the public; new text end new text begin (4) made in a speech, article, publication, or other material that is distributed and made available to the public or through radio, television, cable television, or other medium of mass communication; new text end new text begin (5) a request for a meeting, a request for the status of an action, or any other similar administrative request if the request does not include an attempt to influence a public official or local official; new text end new text begin (6) made in the course of participation in an advisory committee under section 14.101, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (7) testimony given before a committee, subcommittee, or task force of the legislature, or submitted for inclusion in the public record of a hearing conducted by a committee, subcommittee, or task force of the legislature; new text end new text begin (8) information provided in writing in response to an oral or written request by a public official or local official for specific information; new text end new text begin (9) required by subpoena or civil investigative demand, or otherwise compelled by statute, regulation, or other action of the legislature or an agency, including any communication compelled by a state contract, grant, loan, permit, or license; new text end new text begin (10) made in response to a notice in the State Register or other similar publication soliciting communications from the public and directed to the agency official specifically designated in the notice to receive the communications; new text end new text begin (11) not possible to report without disclosing information, the unauthorized disclosure of which is prohibited by law; new text end new text begin (12) made to an official in an agency with regard to: (i) a judicial proceeding or a criminal or civil law enforcement inquiry, investigation, or proceeding; or (ii) a filing or proceeding that the government is specifically required by statute or regulation to maintain or conduct on a confidential basis, if the agency is charged with responsibility for the proceeding, inquiry, investigation, or filing; new text end new text begin (13) made in compliance with written agency procedures regarding an adjudication conducted by the agency under chapter 14 or substantially similar provisions; new text end new text begin (14) a written comment filed in the course of a public proceeding or any other communication that is made on the record in a public proceeding; new text end new text begin (15) a petition for agency action made in writing and required to be a matter of public record pursuant to established agency procedures; new text end new text begin (16) made on behalf of an individual with regard to the individual's benefits, employment, or other personal matters involving only that individual, except this clause does not apply to any communication with a public official or local official with respect to the formulation, modification, or adoption of private legislation for the relief of the individual; new text end new text begin (17) a disclosure by an individual that is protected under section 181.932 or under another provision of law; and new text end new text begin (18) made by: (i) a church, its integrated auxiliary, or a convention or association of churches that is exempt from filing a federal income tax return under paragraph 2(A)(i) of section 6033(a) of title 26; or (ii) a religious order that is exempt from filing a federal income tax return under paragraph (2)(A)(iii) of section 6033(a) of title 26. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Lobbyist. (a) "Lobbyist" means an individualdeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin who is employed or retained by a principal for financial or other compensation for services that include more than one lobbying contact, other than an individual whose lobbying contacts and efforts in support of those lobbying contacts constitute less than 20 percent of the time engaged in the services provided by the individual to that principal over a three-month period.new text end deleted text begin (1) engaged for pay or other consideration of more than $3,000 from all sources in any year: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) for the purpose of attempting to influence legislative or administrative action, or the official action of a political subdivision, by communicating with public or local officials; or deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) from a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from facilitating government relations or government affairs services if the individual's job duties include offering direct or indirect consulting or advice that helps the business provide those services to clients; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) who spends more than $3,000 of the individual's personal funds, not including the individual's own traveling expenses and membership dues, in any year for the purpose of attempting to influence legislative or administrative action, or the official action of a political subdivision, by communicating with public or local officials. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) "Lobbyist" does not include: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) a public official; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) an employee of the state, including an employee of any of the public higher education systems; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) an elected local official; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) a nonelected local official or an employee of a political subdivision acting in an official capacity, unless the nonelected official or employee of a political subdivision spends more than 50 hours in any month attempting to influence legislative or administrative action, or the official action of a political subdivision other than the political subdivision employing the official or employee, by communicating or urging others to communicate with public or local officials, including time spent monitoring legislative or administrative action, or the official action of a political subdivision, and related research, analysis, and compilation and dissemination of information relating to legislative or administrative policy in this state, or to the policies of political subdivisions; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) a party or the party's representative appearing in a proceeding before a state board, commission, or agency of the executive branch unless the board, commission, or agency is taking administrative action; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) an individual while engaged in selling goods or services to be paid for by public funds; deleted text end deleted text begin (7) a news medium or its employees or agents while engaged in the publishing or broadcasting of news items, editorial comments, or paid advertisements which directly or indirectly urge official action; deleted text end deleted text begin (8) a paid expert witness whose testimony is requested by the body before which the witness is appearing, but only to the extent of preparing or delivering testimony; deleted text end deleted text begin (9) a party or the party's representative appearing to present a claim to the legislature and communicating to legislators only by the filing of a claim form and supporting documents and by appearing at public hearings on the claim; or deleted text end deleted text begin (10) an individual providing information or advice to members of a collective bargaining unit when the unit is actively engaged in the collective bargaining process with a state agency or a political subdivision. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) An individual who volunteers personal time to work without pay or other consideration on a lobbying campaign, and who does not spend more than the limit in paragraph (a), clause (2), need not register as a lobbyist. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) An individual who provides administrative support to a lobbyist and whose salary and administrative expenses attributable to lobbying activities are reported as lobbying expenses by the lobbyist, but who does not communicate or urge others to communicate with public or local officials, need not register as a lobbyist. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, subdivision 33, is amended to read: Subd. 33. Principal. "Principal" means an individual or association thatdeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin employs or retains another person for financial or other compensation to conduct lobbying contacts and efforts in support of those lobbying contacts on behalf of the individual or association. A person or entity whose employees act as lobbyists on the individual or association's own behalf is both a principal and an employer of the employees. In the case of a coalition or association that employs or retains other persons to conduct lobbying activities, the principal is the coalition or association and not its individual members.new text end deleted text begin (1) spends more than $3,000 in the aggregate in any calendar year to engage a lobbyist, compensate a lobbyist, or authorize the expenditure of money by a lobbyist; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) spends a total of at least $50,000 in any calendar year to influence legislative action, administrative action, or the official action of political subdivisions, as described in section 10A.04, subdivision 6. deleted text end